Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2079.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Don Bolles memorial; procedures; delayed repeal A. Pursuant to section 41-1363, subsection A, Arizona Revised Statutes, this act authorizes the legislative council to provide for the placement in Wesley Bolin plaza of a memorial dedicated to the commemoration of Don Bolles. B. The procedures prescribed in section 41-1363, Arizona Revised Statutes, apply to the establishment of the memorial. C. Public monies are not authorized for the costs of the memorial. All fundraising and contracts for artistic design and construction of the memorial are the sole responsibility of the proponents. This state may not facilitate fundraising or establish a state fund for the deposit of the monies. D. This section is repealed from and after September 30, 2029. Sec. 2. Legislative findings The legislature finds that the memorial authorized by this act is in recognition of Don Bolles, a well-respected Arizona reporter, who was killed in a car bombing nearly fifty years ago in connection with his investigative work.